Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-4] Third party cases.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no person shall be liable under
this chapter under civil principles of vicarious liability. [L 2004, c 44, pt
of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next